District of Columbia statutes.
2-425

Application of subchapter — Entry of guilty plea.

This subchapter shall not apply to any person whose conviction resulted from his entering a plea of guilty unless that plea was pursuant to North Carolina v. Alford, 400 U.S. 25 (1970) .

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-143, § 6, 27 DCR 4656
1981 Ed., § 1-1225.